District of Columbia statutes.
19-107a

Repealed

Release of dower.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1267, ch. 854, § 494
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 531, ch. 1329
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1087, § 33(c), 23 DCR 2544
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 5(a), 35 DCR 147
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 801(e), 48 DCR 2087
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 92(b), 53 DCR 6794
1981 Ed., § 19-107a.
1973 Ed., § 19-107a.
D.C. Law 16-191, in the section credit for D.C. Law 13-292, validated a previously made technical correction.